Massachusetts, session 194th, H2268.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Ordered that The Town Charter, Article II, Legislative Branch Section 2-13 (a) Annual
Stipend shall be amended to reflect that each member of the Town Council shall receive and
annual stipend, payable in arrears, in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000) and the Town
Council President shall receive an annual stipend, payable in arrears, in the amount of seven
thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Incumbent Councilors shall receive a stipend as above
set forth as of each annual Town Election Day. A Councilor who vacates their office will be
entitled to receive a pro-rated stipend as of the last date of their service. Regardless of
compensation, members of the Town Council shall not be eligible for benefits from the Town.
Any modification of the stipend amounts set-forth herein may be adopted by ordinance duly
adopted by the Town Council, provided however that no increase or reduction in such stipends
shall take effect during the year in which such increase or reduction is voted, and no change in
such ordinance shall be made between the election of a new council and the qualification of the
of 2

new council. Persons elected to serve as councilors by special town election or appointment shall
be eligible for payment of an annual stipend payable in arrears in the amount of $5,000 reduced
on a pro-rated basis commensurate with the number of days beginning with the date of the
special election or appointment. Such ordinance shall be subject to the provisions of MGL
Chapter 39, Section 6A.
of 2